Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-6,117
Parental duties; child less than sixteen.

The parent or guardian of any child who is less than sixteen years old shall not knowingly permit any such child to violate any provision of the Nebraska Rules of the Road.

Laws 1973, LB 45, § 87;

R.S.1943, (1988), § 39-687;

Laws 1993, LB 370, § 213.